District of Columbia statutes.
13-501

Counterclaim by way of set-off as an action by defendant.

In a civil action, a defendant who files a counterclaim by way of set-off shall be deemed to have brought an action at the time of filing the counterclaim for the matters mentioned therein.

History

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 516, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 13-501.
1973 Ed., § 13-501.